New Jersey, session 222, A308.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The act shall be known and may be cited as the Illegal Alien Healthcare Transparency Act. 2.  a.  The Department of Health shall require each health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) to inquire about the citizenship or immigration status of each of the health care facilitys patients. b.  Each licensed health care facility shall submit a monthly report to the department on the citizenship and immigration status of the health care facilitys patients and the health care facilitys monthly cost of care provided to illegal aliens.  Any data and information contained in the report shall be in aggregate form and the report shall not contain the personal identifying information of any patient.  The department shall make each report publicly available on the departments Internet website. c.  It shall be unlawful for any patient to knowingly and willingly make a false statement or representation of a material fact concerning the patients citizenship or immigration status in any document or electronic transmission necessary for a health care facility to complete an inquiry on the patients citizenship or immigration status pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.  Any person who violates the provisions of subsection c. of this section shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. e.  As used in this section, "illegal alien" means an individual who resides in New Jersey, but who is unable to produce documentary evidence to show that the individual is lawfully present. 3.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.